District of Columbia statutes.
1-207.22

Reimbursable appropriations for the District.

(a)

The Secretary of the Treasury is authorized to advance to the District of Columbia the sum of $750,000, out of any money in the Treasury not otherwise appropriated, for use (1) in the paying the expenses of the Board of Education (including compensation of the members thereof), and (2) in otherwise carrying into effect the provisions of this chapter.

(b)

The full amount expended out of the money advanced pursuant to this section shall be reimbursed to the United States, without interest, during the second fiscal year which begins after January 2, 1975, from the general fund of the District.

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 779, Pub. L. 93-198, title VII, § 722

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-207.71.